Utah statutes.
13-14a-8.   Contractual right of return -- Election of penalties.

If the agreement between a dealer and a manufacturer or wholesaler confers rights and duties covering the return of wholegoods and parts inventories upon termination of the agreement, the dealer may elect to proceed under the agreement.  The dealer is not considered to have made this election to the extent that the rights and duties conferred by this chapter exceed those conferred by the sales agreement.



Enacted by Chapter 63, 1989 General Session

